Utah statutes.
70A-4-302.   Payor bank's responsibility for late return of item.
(1)  If an item is presented to and received by a payor bank, the bank is
accountable for the amount of:
(a)  a demand item, other than a documentary draft, whether properly payable
or not, if the bank, in any case in which it is not also the depositary bank,
retains the item beyond midnight of the banking day of receipt without
settling for it or, whether or not it is also the depositary bank, does not
pay or return the item or send notice of dishonor until after its midnight
deadline; or
(b)  any other properly payable item unless, within the time allowed for
acceptance or payment of that item, the bank either accepts or pays the item
or returns it and accompanying documents.
(2)  The liability of a payor bank to pay an item pursuant to Subsection (1)
is subject to defenses based on breach of a presentment warranty, Section
70A-4-208, or proof that the person seeking enforcement of the liability
presented or transferred the item for the purpose of defrauding the payor
bank.
